Colorado, session 2026A, HB1260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-111, amend
(4)(b) and (12)(a) as follows:
26.5-4-111. Services - eligibility - assistance provided - waiting
lists - rules - exceptions from cooperating with child support
establishment.
(4) (b) The executive director by rule shall establish, and at least
every five years review and revise, as appropriate, a copayment schedule so
that the copayment gradually increases as the family income approaches
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

self-sufficiency income levels, but must be no greater than seven percent of
the family's gross monthly income on or before August 1, 2026 AUGUST 1,
2028, regardless of the number of children in care, as determined based on
one month of income, unless one month of income does not provide an
accurate indication of anticipated income, in which case the county may use
evidence of up to the most recent twelve months of income; however, if a
federal rule limits copayments to less than seven percent of the family's
gross monthly income, the department shall immediately comply with the
federal limit. This revised copayment schedule should allow families to
retain a portion of their increases in income.
(12) Each county:
(a) Upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant
case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated
tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (12)(a), and
pursuant to department rules, on or before August 1, 2026 AUGUST 1, 2028,
and subject to available federal appropriations, in addition to regular
provider reimbursement rates, the county departments shall pay providers
for care in alignment with common practices in the private market for child
care, including paying providers weekly for each child based on child
enrollment in advance of the provision of services. The department rules
governing payment policies must allow daily reimbursement rates only for
drop-in child care, back-up child care, and care that is commonly paid on
a daily reimbursement basis in the private child care market and must
incentivize providers to promote regular program attendance. On or before
August 1, 2026 AUGUST 1, 2028, and subject to available federal
appropriations, the department and county departments shall utilize grants
and contracts for underserved populations, including children in
underserved geographic areas, infants and toddlers, children with
disabilities, and families needing nontraditional-hour care, to improve
equitable access for these populations. The department shall annually
evaluate data regarding the numbers and percentages of underserved
populations being served by CCCAP to determine if equitable access is
improved or achieved. The executive director shall promulgate ADOPT rules
for the implementation of this subsection (12).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-114, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(i), and (1)(j)(V); and add (1)(k) as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1260

26.5-4-114. Colorado child care assistance program - reporting
requirements.
(1) On or before November 1, 2022, and on or before November 1
each year thereafter, the department shall prepare a report on CCCAP.
Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department shall provide
the report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the public
and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of
representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate,
or any successor committees. The report must include, at a minimum, the
following information related to benchmarks of success for CCCAP:
(i) An estimate of unmet need for CCCAP in each county and
throughout the state based on estimates of the number of children and
families who are likely to be eligible for CCCAP in each county but who
are not enrolled in CCCAP, disaggregated by estimated ages from birth
through thirteen years of age; and
(j) Beginning with the report submitted November 1, 2024, and in
each annual report thereafter:
(V) An explanation of the quality incentives made available to
providers; AND
(k) BEGINNING WITH THE REPORT SUBMITTED NOVEMBER 1, 2026,
AND IN EACH ANNUAL REPORT THEREAFTER:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CCCAP ALLOCATION THAT IS SPENT BY
THE DEPARTMENT AND EACH COUNTY ON:
(A) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES, INCLUDING SALARIES AND
OPERATING EXPENSES OF STAFF WHO PERFORM ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS;
(B) COUNTY INDIRECT EXPENSES, CHARGED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
COUNTY COST ALLOCATION PLANS;
(C) PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION COSTS THAT ARE REPORTED AS
NONDIRECT SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL CHILD CARE
DEVELOPMENT FUND REGULATIONS, SUCH AS SALARIES AND OPERATING
EXPENSES FOR CASEWORKERS TO COMPLETE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1260

AND REDETERMINATION, ERROR RATE REVIEWS AND COMPLIANCE, AND
OTHER PROGRAM ACTIVITIES NECESSARY TO OPERATE THE PROGRAM; AND
(D) DIRECT SERVICE EXPENSES.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect August 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1260

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1260